Mississippi, session 2026, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 83-9-253, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-9-253.  The Commissioner of Insurance shall have the authority to: (a)  Establish any program, promulgate any rule, policy, guideline, or plan; or change any program, rule, policy or guideline to implement, establish, create, administer, or otherwise operate an exchange; (b)  Apply for, accept or expend federal monies related to the creation, implementation or operation of an exchange; (c)  Establish any advisory board or committee the Commissioner deems necessary for providing recommendations on the creation, implementation or operation of an exchange; (d)  Use the services and funds of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Risk Pool Association and the Comprehensive Health Insurance Risk Pool Board to fulfill the purposes of this section; * * * and (e)  Engage such actuarial and other assistance as shall be necessary to carry out the duties of the department under Sections 83-9-251 through 83-9-257.  The engagement of such services shall not be subject to the procurement provisions of Section 31-7-13 * * *.; and (f)  Apply for a State Innovation Waiver as authorized under Section 1332 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 USC Section 18052). The Commissioner of Insurance may, immediately after May 14, 2024, begin action to carry out the authority provided in this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.